Alaska statutes. Title 31. Oil and Gas.
Chapter 25. Alaska Gasline Development Corporation.

Cross references. —

For findings, intent, and transitional provisions related to the enactment of this chapter, see secs. 1 and 25, ch. 11, SLA 2013 in the 2013 Temporary and Special Acts.

For provision requiring the parties to a North Slope natural gas project developed under the authority of ch. 14, SLA 2014 to provide periodic briefings to the legislature before the first flow of gas in the project, see sec. 77, ch. 14, SLA 2014 in the 2014 Temporary and Special Acts.

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 14, SLA 2014, see 2014 Senate Journal 1423 — 1426.

Effective dates. —

Section 27, ch. 11, SLA 2013 makes this chapter effective May 22, 2013, in accordance with AS

01.10.070(c)

.